California statutes. Education Code
(a) Instruction shall be given in the elementary and secondary schools by appropriately trained instructors on drug education and the effects of the use of tobacco, alcohol, narcotics, dangerous drugs, as defined in Section 11032 of the Health and Safety Code, and other dangerous substances.

For purposes of this chapter, an “appropriately trained instructor” is one who, based upon the determination of the site administrator, demonstrates competencies in interacting in a positive manner with children and youth; demonstrates knowledge of the properties and effects of tobacco, alcohol, narcotics, and dangerous drugs; and who demonstrates skills in conducting affective education, which include methods and techniques for helping children and youth to freely express ideas and opinions in a responsible manner and to gain an awareness of their values as they affect decisions related to drug use and misuse.

In grades 1 through 6, instruction on drug education should be conducted in conjunction with courses given on health pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 51210.

In grades 7 to 12, inclusive, instruction on drug education shall be conducted in conjunction with courses given on health or in any appropriate area of study pursuant to Section 51220.

Such instruction shall be sequential in nature and suited to meet the needs of students at their respective grade level.

(b) Services provided under this section shall be in addition to, but shall not be duplicative of, services provided pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11965) of Part 3 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 880, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

51261.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 44227 and 44228, the State Board of Education shall not accredit any teacher education institution for teacher certification purposes after the 1972–73 fiscal year unless it offers courses for prospective teachers on drug education and the effects of the use of tobacco, alcohol, narcotics, restricted dangerous drugs, as defined in Section 11032 of the Health and Safety Code, and other dangerous substances. The State Board of Education shall continually reevaluate approved teacher training institutions to insure that programs are in conformance with the intent of this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 242.)
-------------------------------------------

51262.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the use of anabolic steroids to expedite the physical development and to enhance the performance level of secondary school athletes presents a serious health hazard to these student athletes. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this measure that, beginning with the 1987–88 school year, schools be encouraged to include in instruction in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, in science, health, drug abuse, or physical education programs a lesson on the effects of the use of anabolic steroids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 840, Sec. 24.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

51263.

The State Department of Education shall make available information on model drug and alcohol abuse prevention education programs developed and funded pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 11965) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 10.5 of the Health and Safety Code, Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 13860) of Title 6 of Part 4 of the Penal Code, and other public and private sources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 828, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

51264.

(a) The State Department of Education shall prepare and distribute to school districts and county offices of education guidelines for incorporating in-service training in gang violence and drug and alcohol abuse prevention for teachers, counselors, athletic directors, school board members, and other educational personnel into the staff development plans of all school districts and county offices of education.

(b) The department shall, upon request, assist school districts and county offices of education in developing comprehensive gang violence and drug and alcohol abuse prevention in-service training programs. The department’s information and guidelines, to the maximum extent
 possible, shall encourage school districts and county offices of education to avoid duplication of effort by sharing resources, adapting or adopting model in-service training programs, developing joint and collaborative programs, and coordinating efforts with existing state staff development programs, county gang violence and drug and alcohol staff development programs, county health departments, county and city law enforcement agencies, and other public and private agencies providing health, drug, alcohol, gang violence prevention, or other related services at the local level.

(c) The department shall assist school districts and county offices of education in qualifying for the receipt of federal and state funds to support their gang violence and drug and alcohol abuse prevention in-service training programs.

(d) Each school that chooses to utilize the provisions of this article related to in-service training in gang violence and drug and alcohol abuse prevention, is encouraged to develop a single plan to strengthen its gang violence and drug and alcohol abuse prevention efforts. If a school develops or has developed a school improvement plan pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 52010) of Chapter 6 of Part 28, or a school safety plan pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 32280) of Chapter 2.5 of Part 19, it is encouraged to incorporate into that plan, where appropriate, the gang violence and drug and alcohol prevention plan that it has developed.

(e) The department shall consult with the Office of Emergency Services regarding gang
 violence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 72.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

51265.

It is the intent of the Legislature that school districts and county offices of education give high priority to gang violence and drug and alcohol abuse prevention in-service training programs, which shall be part of the overall strategy for comprehensive gang violence and drug and alcohol abuse prevention education.

“Gang violence and drug and alcohol abuse prevention in-service training” for purposes of this article means the presentation of programs, instruction and curricula that will help educators develop competencies in interacting in a positive manner with children and youth to assist them in developing the positive values, self-esteem, knowledge, and skills to lead productive, gang-free and drug-free lives; develop knowledge of the causes of gang violence and substance abuse, and the properties and effects of tobacco, alcohol, narcotics, and dangerous drugs, including the risk of contracting acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS) associated with intravenous drug use; receive training regarding available information and resources concerning gang violence and drug and alcohol abuse prevention as well as antigang and antisubstance abuse crime trends; develop familiarity with teaching social skills and resistance skills to children and youth; and develop skills in conducting effective education, which includes methods and techniques for helping children and youth to freely express ideas and opinions in a responsible manner and to understand the nature and consequences of their decisions as they relate to gang involvement and drug and alcohol abuse.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1048, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

51266.

(a) The Office of Emergency Services, in collaboration with the State Department of Education, shall develop a model gang violence suppression and substance abuse prevention curriculum for grades 2, 4, and 6. The curriculum for grades 2, 4, and 6 shall be modeled after a similar curriculum that has been developed by the Orange County Office of Education for grades 3, 5, and 7. The Office of Emergency Services, in collaboration with the State Department of Education, may contract with a county office of education for the development of the model curriculum. The model curriculum shall be made available to school districts and county offices of education and shall, at a minimum, provide for each of the following:

(1) Lessons for grades 2, 4, and 6 that are aligned with the state curriculum frameworks for history, social science, and English and language arts.

(2) Instructional resources that address issues of ethnic diversity and at-promise pupils.

(3) The integration of the instructional resources of the Office of Emergency Services and the School/Law Enforcement Partnership in order to support the school curriculum and assist in the alignment of the state curriculum framework.

(b) The Office of Emergency Services shall develop an independent evaluation of the pupil outcomes of the model gang violence suppression and substance abuse prevention curriculum program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 12.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

51266.5.

The Rural Gang Task Force Subcommittee provided for by subdivision (g) of Section 13826.1 of the Penal Code, in collaboration with the Gang Violence Suppression Advisory Committee provided for by subdivision (g) of Section 13826.1 of the Penal Code and the Office of Emergency Services, shall review the model gang violence suppression and substance abuse prevention curriculum for grades 2, 4, and 6, developed pursuant to Section 51266, and identify methods by which the curriculum can best be utilized in rural school settings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 74.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

51268.

The State Department of Education shall encourage school districts and county offices of education to avoid duplication of efforts with regard to education programs for the prevention of drug, alcohol, and tobacco abuse through the following methods:

(a) The sharing of resources.

(b) The adaptation or adoption of model programs.

(c) The development of joint and collaborative programs.

(d) Coordination of the local planning and implementation of state programs with local health, social services, criminal justice, and education agencies and other entities.

(e) The use of a single community advisory committee or task force for drug, alcohol, and tobacco abuse prevention programs, as an alternative to the creation of a separate group for that purpose under each state or federally funded program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 923, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

51269.

(a) The State Department of Education shall collaborate, to the extent possible, with other state agencies that administer drug, alcohol, and tobacco abuse prevention education programs to streamline and simplify the process whereby local educational agencies apply for state and federal drug, alcohol, and tobacco education funds.

(b) The State Department of Education, in consultation with the Department of Justice, Office of Emergency Services, the State Department of Public Health, and the State Department of Health Care Services, shall develop, to the extent possible, an ongoing statewide monitoring and assessment system to provide current and reliable data on the utilization of resources for programs for prevention of
 and early intervention for drug, alcohol, and tobacco abuse. The purpose of the system shall be to facilitate improved planning and program delivery among state and local agencies, including law enforcement, juvenile justice, county health, and county drug and alcohol agencies and programs, and communities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 6.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Primary Education Model Curriculum for Lifelong Health, Aging, and Financial Literacy [51280. - 51284.5.]

51280.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) There are profound personal and financial implications for Californians associated with the average life expectancy steadily increasing toward 100 years of age.

(2) The savings rate among “boomers” continues to drop, while their cumulative debt continues to rise.

(3) A majority of workers choose to “cash out” of their employment savings plans when changing jobs, rather than transferring the accounts upon job changes and maintaining their savings in these accounts.

(4) It is estimated that 40 to 50 percent of “boomers” will likely find themselves living their later years in financial hardship.

(5) Californians should be financially prepared for, and aware of, the lifelong health issues associated with later life.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation that will result in the education of all Californians regarding our prospect of becoming an “aging” state, including education as to all of the following:

(1) The changes we can expect in the later years of our lives.

(2) The changes we can expect of a society that is growing older.

(3) How we can be better prepared to sustain ourselves and our society in the coming years.

(4) The financial realities of living for a century.

(5) The importance of saving and financial planning.

(6) The financial benefits of healthful living and disease prevention.

(7) A new vision of aging, thereby dispelling ageist myths.

(8) An understanding of chronic disease and illness, with an emphasis on disease prevention and health in later life.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 541, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

51282.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation to establish educational requirements in order to instill in California’s youth a sense of importance about lifelong financial planning and preparation, including, among other things, the costs of health care, in a much-extended later life.

(b) Educational institutions have developed a model curriculum in lifelong healthy aging and financial preparedness, with materials, free of charge, for the Superintendent of Public Instruction to disseminate to school teachers at the local level.

(c) The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make this existing curriculum available to teachers, using materials that are currently available at no cost, with information and links provided through the Internet, in order to provide to students in grades 7 to 12, inclusive, instruction on human growth, human development, and financial preparedness.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 541, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

51284.

Concurrently with, but not prior to, the next revision of textbooks or curriculum frameworks in the social sciences, health, and mathematics curricula, the state board shall ensure that these academic areas integrate components of human growth, human development, and human contribution to society, across the life course, and also financial literacy, including, but not limited to, budgeting and managing credit, student loans,
 consumer debt, and identity theft security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 135, Sec. 3.   (AB 166)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

51284.5.

Notwithstanding Section 51284, when the history-social science curriculum framework is revised after January 1, 2017, the Instructional Quality Commission shall consider including both of the following:

(a) Age-appropriate information for grade spans, as listed in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (b), on financial literacy that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Fundamentals of banking for personal use, including, but not limited to, savings and checking and managing to minimize fees.

(2) Principles of budgeting for independent living.

(3) Employment
 and understanding factors that affect net income, including the topics described in subdivision (a) of Section 49110.5.

(4) Uses and effects of credit, including managing credit scores and the relation of debt and interest to credit.

(5) Uses and costs of loans, including student loans, as well as policies that provide student loan forgiveness.

(6) Types and costs of insurance, including home, auto, health, and life insurance.

(7) Impacts of the tax system, including its impact on personal income, the process to file taxes, and how to read tax forms and pay stubs.

(8) Principles of investing and building wealth, including investment alternatives to build financial security, including
 tax-advantaged investments such as pensions and 401(k) plans, individual retirement accounts (IRAs), and stocks, bonds, mutual funds, and index funds.

(9) Enhancing consumer protection skills by raising awareness of common scams and frauds and preventing identity theft.

(10) Identifying means to finance college, workforce education, low-cost community college options, and other career technical educational pathways or apprenticeships. Financing options covered may include scholarships, merit aid, the California Kids Investment and Development Savings Program, as established in Article 19.5 (commencing with Section 69996) of Chapter 2 of Part 42 of Division 5 of Title 3, and student loans.

(11) Understanding how
 psychology can impact one’s financial well-being.

(12) Charitable giving.

(13) Other topics that are directly and specifically relevant to personal finance.

(b) Age-appropriate content related to the topics listed in paragraphs (1) to (13), inclusive, of subdivision (a), at least twice in each of the following grade spans:

(1) Kindergarten and grades 1 to 5, inclusive.

(2) Grades 6 to 8, inclusive.

(3) Grades 9 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 8, Sec. 47.   (AB 121)   Effective June 27, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Diplomas and Certificates [51400. - 51475.]



  ARTICLE 1. Elementary School Diploma [51400. - 51403.]

51400.

The governing board of any school district maintaining an elementary school may provide for the conferring of diplomas of graduation, by examination, and may issue diplomas of graduation from the elementary schools of the district and from special day and evening classes of elementary grade maintained by the district of any type or class.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51401.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as prohibiting the governing board of any school district from issuing diplomas of graduation without examination to the pupils in any school which has been accredited by the county board of education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51402.

The diplomas of graduation from elementary schools shall be conferred only upon the pupils who have completed the course of study prescribed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51403.

Elementary school diplomas granted by the governing board of a school district may be on blanks furnished by the Superintendent of Public Instruction or on forms provided by the district, which shall be subject to the approval of the Superintendent of Public Instruction. All diplomas shall be signed by a majority of the members of the board or its designated representative. Facsimile signatures or signature stamps may be used for this purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Diplomas [51410. - 51413.]

51410.

No diploma, certificate or other document which is conferred upon a pupil as evidence of his completion of a prescribed course of study or training shall bear any distinctive marking or words which indicate that the pupil upon whom it was conferred was, for purposes of his course of study or training, placed within a particular classification based upon his intellectual or mental capacity.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to prevent a diploma, certificate or other document from indicating that the pupil upon whom it is conferred maintained exceptionally high grades during his course of study or training, or that he completed his course with honors, or to prevent the governing board of any school district from publicizing such information.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51411.

No governing board of any school district maintaining a high school shall require as a condition for graduation from the high schools within the district that a pupil have resided within the district for any minimum length of time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 36.)
-------------------------------------------

51412.

No diploma, certificate or other document, except transcripts and letters of recommendation, shall be conferred on a pupil as evidence of completion of a prescribed course of study or training, or of satisfactory attendance, unless the pupil has met the standards of proficiency in basic skills prescribed by the governing board of the high school district, or equivalent thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1058, Sec. 43.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

51413.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board or body of a local educational agency, and the department on behalf of state special schools, shall grant a diploma of graduation from high school to any pupil who completed grade 12 in the 2003–04 school year through the 2014–15 school year and met all applicable graduation requirements other than the passage of the high school exit examination required pursuant to former Section 60851, as that section read on January 1, 2017.

(b) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 11.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. High School Equivalency Certificates [51420. - 51427.]

51420.

The Superintendent shall issue a California high school equivalency certificate and an official score report, or an official score report only, to any person who has not completed high school and who meets all of the following requirements:

(a) Is a resident of this state or is a member of the armed services assigned to duty in this state.

(b) Has taken all or a portion of a high school equivalency test that has been approved by the state board and that is administered by a testing center approved by
 the department, with a score determined by the state board to be equal to the standard of performance expected from high school graduates.

(c) Meets one of the following:

(1) Is at least 18 years of age.

(2) Would have graduated from high school had he or she remained in school and followed the usual course of study toward graduation.

(3) Is at least 17 years of age, has accumulated fewer than 100 units of high school credit, and is confined to a state or county hospital or to an institution maintained by a state or county correctional agency.

(4) (A) Is at least 17 years of age, has accumulated fewer than 100 units of high school credit prior to enrollment in the
 academic program described in this paragraph, and has successfully completed the academic program offered by a dropout recovery high school that provides the pupil with all of the following:

(i) Instruction aligned to state academic content standards.

(ii) The opportunity to complete the requirements for a high school diploma.

(iii) At least one year of instruction or instruction followed by services related to the academic program.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, “dropout recovery high school” has the same meaning as set forth in subparagraph (D) of paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 52052.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 663, Sec. 1.   (AB 1176)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

51421.

(a) The Superintendent may charge a one-time only fee, established by the state board, to be submitted by an examinee when registering for the test sufficient in an amount not greater than the amount required to pay the cost of administering this article, including costs related to subdivision (b), and for the cost of providing services related to the completion of a high school equivalency test that has been approved by the state board. The amount of each fee may not exceed twenty dollars ($20) per person.

(b) The examinee shall be
 responsible for submitting to the Superintendent both of the following requests:

(1) A request for a duplicate copy of the high school equivalency certificate.

(2) A request to forward a report of the results of a high school equivalency test approved by the state board to a postsecondary educational institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 663, Sec. 2.   (AB 1176)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

51421.5.

(a) If, for purposes of this article, a contractor or testing center charges an examinee its own separate fee, the contractor or testing center shall not charge that fee to an examinee who meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The examinee qualifies as a homeless child or youth, as defined in paragraph (2) of Section 725 of the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a(2)), or as a foster youth, as defined in subdivision (f).

(2) The examinee has not attained 25 years of age as of the date of the scheduled examination.

(3) For an examinee who qualifies as a
 homeless child or youth pursuant to paragraph (1), the examinee can verify his or her status as a homeless child or youth. A homeless services provider that has knowledge of the examinee’s housing status may verify the examinee’s status for purposes of this paragraph.

(b) For purposes of this section, a “homeless services provider” includes either of the following:

(1) A homeless services provider listed in paragraph (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 103577 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Any other person or entity that is qualified to verify an individual’s housing status, as determined by the department.

(c) Additional state funds shall not be appropriated for purposes of implementing this section.

(d) The Superintendent shall adopt emergency regulations, as necessary, to implement this section. The adoption of these regulations shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare.

(e) The department shall include a provision in all memorandums of understanding with contractors for purposes of providing a high school equivalency test, that if the surplus funds in the Special Deposit Fund Account are depleted, the ongoing costs of a fee waiver for an examinee deemed eligible for a waiver pursuant to this section shall be absorbed by the contractor.

(f) For purposes of this section, a “foster youth” means any individual who meets or has ever met one of the following criteria:

(1) A child who was the subject of a petition filed pursuant to Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and removed from his or her home by the juvenile court pursuant to Section 319 or 361 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(2) A child who was the subject of a petition filed pursuant to Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and removed from his or her home by the juvenile court pursuant to Section 727 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(g) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 384, Sec. 4) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 697, Sec. 3.   (AB 2656)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Section operative July 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

51422.

Each scoring contractor shall provide the Superintendent with a set of results for each examinee who has taken all or a portion of a high school equivalency test that has been approved by the state board. Each scoring contractor shall forward to the Superintendent the fee established pursuant to Section 51421 for each examinee who has taken the general educational development test.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 55.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

51423.

(a) (1) The Superintendent may provide for the administration of a high school equivalency test that has been approved by the state board to persons confined to state or county hospitals or to institutions maintained by state or county correctional agencies.

(2) Those agencies, upon request, shall reimburse the Superintendent in an amount sufficient to pay the cost of administering the test.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the Superintendent may grant a waiver to a county office of education to provide a preparation program, for a high school equivalency test that has been approved by the state board, as part of any other instructional program during the regular schoolday to a person who is at least 17 years of age, has accumulated insufficient units of high school credit to graduate from high school by 18 years of age, and is confined to a state or county hospital or to an institution maintained by a state or county correctional agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 663, Sec. 4.   (AB 1176)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

51424.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall keep a permanent record of California high school equivalency certificates issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 163, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

51425.

A California high school equivalency certificate shall be deemed to be a high school diploma for the purpose of meeting the requirements of employment by all state and local public agencies in this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51426.

The State Board of Education shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to implement this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

51427.

Pursuant to Section 16370 of the Government Code, there is hereby authorized in the State Treasury a Special Deposit Fund Account, which shall consist of fees that may be prescribed by Sections 51421 and 51423. All of the fees collected are hereby appropriated without regard to fiscal year for the support of the Department of Education to be used pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1546, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Retroactive High School Diplomas [51430. - 51442.]

51430.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a high school district, unified school district, county office of education, or the governing body of a charter school may retroactively grant a high school diploma to a person who has not received a high school diploma if they meet any of the following conditions:

(1) The person was interned by order of the federal government during World War II and was enrolled in a high school operated by the school district or under the jurisdiction of the county office of education immediately preceding their internment and did not receive a high school diploma because their education was interrupted due to their internment during World War II.

(2) The person is a veteran of
 World War II, the Korean War, or the Vietnam War; was honorably discharged from their military service; was enrolled in a high school operated by the school district or under the jurisdiction of the county office of education immediately preceding their military service in those wars; and did not receive a high school diploma because their education was interrupted due to their military service in those wars.

(3) The person has departed California against their will, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 48204.4, and, at the time of their departure, was enrolled in grade 12 of a high school operated by the school district, by or under the jurisdiction of the county office of education, or by the charter school; did not receive a high school diploma because their education was interrupted due to their departure; and was in good academic standing at the time of their departure. In making an evaluation as to whether to award a high school
 diploma to a pupil who meets the conditions of this paragraph, a school district, county office of education, or charter school shall consider any coursework that may have been completed by the pupil outside of the United States or that may have been completed by the pupil through online or virtual courses.

(4) The person was in their senior year of high school during the 2019–20 school year; in good academic standing and on track to graduate at the end of the 2019–20 school year, as of March 1, 2020; and unable to complete the statewide graduation requirements as a result of the COVID-19 crisis.

(b) A high school district, unified school district, or county office of education may retroactively grant a high school diploma to a deceased person who meets the conditions of paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (a), to be received by the next of kin of the deceased
 person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 66, Sec. 2.   (AB 1350)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

51440.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, subject to regulations that the state board shall prescribe, a high school district, unified school district, or county office of education maintaining a four-year high school or senior high school, may, for a person who has not received a high school diploma included in paragraph (2), evaluate classes completed in any high school, community college, or state college; grant credit toward graduation for military service and training received while in the military service of the United States, and if satisfied that that person has completed the equivalent of the requirements for graduation from high school, grant him or her a diploma of graduation.

(2) Persons who may be granted a diploma pursuant to paragraph (1) are:

(A) A former member of the Armed Forces who is a resident of this state and who has received an honorable discharge.

(B) A member of the Armed Forces who is, and on the date he or she entered the Armed Forces was, a resident of this state.

(b) A veteran who entered the military service of the United States while a pupil in grade 12 of a high school and who at the time of his or her entrance into military service had satisfactorily completed the first half of the work required for grade 12 shall be granted a diploma of graduation from that high school.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 255, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

51442.

For purposes of this article, “veteran” means a person who has served 90 days or more in the military service of the United States during a war with a foreign power or during any national emergency declared by the President of the United States and who has received an honorable discharge from that service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 255, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Golden State Seal Merit Diploma [51450. - 51455.]

51450.

The Golden State Seal Merit Diploma is hereby established as an honors diploma to recognize high school graduates who have mastered the high school curriculum. The Golden State Seal Merit Diploma shall be awarded jointly by the State Board of Education and the Superintendent of Public Instruction to each qualifying high school student.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 204, Sec. 13.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

51451.

A student who meets the following requirements shall qualify for a Golden State Seal Merit Diploma:

(a) The completion of all requirements for a high school diploma.

(b) A demonstration of the mastery of the curriculum in at least six subject matter areas, four of which shall be mathematics, English language arts, science, and United States history, with the remaining two subject matter areas selected by the student.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 204, Sec. 13.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

51452.

The state board shall determine and adopt, based upon the recommendations of the Superintendent, the following:

(a) The means by which pupils may demonstrate mastery of the curriculum. For subject matter areas, the means may include, but shall not be limited to, any subject matter examinations deemed appropriately rigorous by the state board. For this purpose, the state board may designate examinations administered by or under the auspices of the department, or examinations produced by private providers or local educational agencies, that are supervised and administered under conditions that are deemed adequate by the state board.

(b) Pupil performance standards or achievement levels
 that demonstrate mastery of the curriculum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 303, Sec. 13.   (SB 509)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

51453.

Under the policy direction of the State Board of Education and the administrative leadership of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the State Department of Education shall do the following:

(a) Ensure that the results of the Golden State Examination are sent to school districts in a timely manner and work with providers of other examinations to provide timely information to school districts on students who have met the performance standards so that school districts can efficiently maintain student records and identify pupils who meet the requirements of the Golden State Seal Merit Diploma.

(b) Prepare and distribute to school districts an appropriate insignia to be affixed to a student’s diploma and transcript indicating that the student has been awarded a Golden State Seal Merit Diploma by the State Board of Education and the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(c) Consider whether it would be appropriate and feasible to provide any additional awards to recipients of the Golden State Seal Merit Diploma.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 204, Sec. 13.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

51454.

Each school district that confers high school diplomas shall maintain appropriate records in order to identify students who have earned a Golden State Seal Merit Diploma, and shall affix the appropriate insignia to the diploma and transcript of each student that earns a Golden State Seal Merit Diploma.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 204, Sec. 13.   Effective July 22, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

51455.
